fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Kestävyysurheilu > Kuntoilulaitteet kestävyysharjoitteluun > Porraslaitteet ja stepperit: Porraslaitteet; Stepperit
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Kardio > Kardiomaskiner > Trappe- og stepmaskiner: Trappemaskiner; Stepmaskiner
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Kardio > Kardio naprave > Stopnice in steperji: Stopnice; Steperji
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Kardio cvičenie > Stroje na kardio tréning > Nekonečné schody a stepery: Nekonečné schody; Stepery
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Cardio > Cardiogeräte > Stair Climber & Stepper: Stair Climber; Stepper
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Cardio > Máquinas de cardio > Steps: Escaladoras de peldaños; Escaladoras de pedales
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Cardio > Cardioapparaten > Trapklimmers en -steppers: Klimmachines; Steppers
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Ασκήσεις καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Μηχανήματα καρδιοαναπνευστικής άσκησης > Αναρριχητήρες με σκάλες & βηματιστήρες: Αναρριχητήρες με σκάλες; Βηματιστήρες
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Kardiyo > Kardiyo Makineleri > Merdiven Çıkma Egzersiz Makineleri: Merdiven Tırmanıcıları; Merdiven Basamakları
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 有酸素運動 > フィットネスマシン > ステアクライマー・ステッパー: 階段昇降機; 階段ステッパー
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Cardio > Cardio Machines > Stair Climbers & Steppers: Stair Climbers; Stair Steppers
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Кардиотренировки > Кардиотренажеры > Тренажеры-лестницы и степперы: Тренажеры-лестницы; Степперы
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardio > Aparelhos para exercícios aeróbicos > Steppers: Simuladores de escalada; Simuladores de escada
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Kardiotreniruotės > Kardiotreniruokliai > Laiptų ir žingsniavimo treniruokliai: Laiptų treniruokliai; Žingsniavimo treniruokliai
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Kardio > Trenažéry > Steppery: Fitness schody (stair climbers); Fitness schody (stair steppers)
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Кардио тренировки > Уреди за кардио тренировки > Уреди за изкачване на стълби и степери: Уреди за изкачване на стълби; Степери
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Cardio > Cardio-maskiner > Trappemaskiner: Stepmaskine; Stepper
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Cardio > Cardio machine > Stepper: Stair climber; Bicicletta ellittica
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Trening kardio > Sprzęt kardio > Steppery: Schody treningowe; Steppery treningowe
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 카디오 > 심장 강화 운동 기구 > 스테어 클라이머/스테퍼: 스테어 클라이머; 스테어 스테퍼
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Cardio > Aparate pentru cardio > Scări rulante și steppere pentru fitness: Scări rulante pentru fitness; Steppere pentru fitness
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Kardió > Kardiógépek > Lépcsőzőgépek és taposógépek: Lépcsőzőgépek; Taposógépek
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 有氧运动 > 有氧运动机 > 扭腰踏步机: 爬楼梯机; 踏步机
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > คาร์ดิโอ > เครื่องคาดิโอ > เครื่องปีนบันไดและสเต็ปเปอร์: เครื่องออกกำลังกายแบบก้าวขึ้นลงบันได; เครื่องออกกำลังกายแบบก้าวเหยียบขึ้นลงบันได
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Cardio > Machines de cardiotraining > Marchepieds et steps d’exercice: Simulateurs d’escalier; Escaliers pas à pas
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Kardio > Kardio sprave > Stepere i simulatori za penjanje: Simulatori za penjanje; Steperi
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 心肺運動 > 心肺訓練器材 > 登山機: 登階機; 踏步機
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bài tập dành cho tim > Máy tập cardio > Máy trèo và leo cầu thang: Máy tập leo cầu thang; Máy tập bước cầu thang
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Cardiofitness > Máquinas de cardiofitness > Máquinas de escadas e steppers: Máquinas de escadas; Steppers de escadas
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Konditionsträning > Maskiner för kardioträning > Trappmaskiner: Trappklättrare; Trappmaskin